Washington statutes.
RCW 38.44.010

Commander-in-chief may order enrollment.

Whenever the commander-in-chief shall deem it necessary, in event of, or imminent danger of war, insurrection, rebellion, invasion, tumult, riot, resistance to law or process, breach of the peace, public disaster, or the imminent occurrence of any of these events, the commander-in-chief may order an enrollment by counties of all persons subject to military duty, designating the county assessor or some other person for each county to act as county enrolling officer. Each county enrolling officer may appoint such assistant or assistants as may be authorized by the commander-in-chief. In each county the enrollment shall include every sane able bodied inhabitant not under sentence for a felony, who is more than eighteen and less than forty-five years of age. The enrollment shall be made in triplicate and shall state the name, residence, age, occupation and previous or existing military or naval service of each person enrolled. When complete the rolls shall be verified under oath by the enrolling officer, who shall immediately thereupon file one copy with the adjutant general of the state and another with the county auditor, retaining the third copy for himself or herself.

[ 1989 c 19 s 55; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 57; 1909 c 134 s 4; 1895 c 108 s 4; RRS s 8456.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.